Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.260

Records and reports of licensees for assessment purposes.

Each licensee, in addition to other records required under the provisions of this chapter, shall keep such records and make such reports as the director may require for the purpose of computing payments of assessments by such licensee.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 26.]